Illinois, session 104th, SB3449.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Identification Card Act is amended 5by changing Sections 4 and 14D as follows: 6    (15 ILCS 335/4)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-457)8    Sec. 4. Identification card. 9    (a) In accordance with the requirements of this Section, 10the Secretary of State shall issue a standard Illinois 11Identification Card, as well as a mobile Illinois 12Identification Card, to any natural person who is a resident 13of the State of Illinois who applies for such a card, or 14renewal thereof. No identification card shall be issued to any 15person who holds a valid foreign state identification card, 16license, or permit unless the person first surrenders to the 17Secretary of State the valid foreign state identification 18card, license, or permit. The card shall be prepared and 19supplied by the Secretary of State and shall include a 20photograph and signature or mark of the applicant. However, 21the Secretary of State may provide by rule for the issuance of 22Illinois Identification Cards without photographs if the 23applicant has a bona fide religious objection to being   SB3449 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1photographed or to the display of his or her photograph. The 2Illinois Identification Card may be used for identification 3purposes in any lawful situation only by the person to whom it 4was issued. As used in this Act, "photograph" means any color 5photograph or digitally produced and captured image of an 6applicant for an identification card. As used in this Act, 7"signature" means the name of a person as written by that 8person and captured in a manner acceptable to the Secretary of 9State.10    (a-5) If an applicant for an identification card has a 11current driver's license or instruction permit issued by the 12Secretary of State, the Secretary may require the applicant to 13utilize the same residence address and name on the 14identification card, driver's license, and instruction permit 15records maintained by the Secretary. The Secretary may 16promulgate rules to implement this provision. 17    (a-10) If the applicant is a judicial officer as defined 18in Section 1-10 of the Judicial Privacy Act, a public official 19as defined in Section 10 of the Public Official Safety and 20Privacy Act, or a peace officer, the applicant may elect to 21have his or her office or work address listed on the card 22instead of the applicant's residence or mailing address. The 23Secretary may promulgate rules to implement this provision. 24For the purposes of this subsection (a-10), "peace officer" 25means any person who by virtue of his or her office or public 26employment is vested by law with a duty to maintain public   SB3449 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1order or to make arrests for a violation of any penal statute 2of this State, whether that duty extends to all violations or 3is limited to specific violations. 4    (a-15) The Secretary of State may provide for an expedited 5process for the issuance of an Illinois Identification Card. 6The Secretary shall charge an additional fee for the expedited 7issuance of an Illinois Identification Card, to be set by 8rule, not to exceed $75. All fees collected by the Secretary 9for expedited Illinois Identification Card service shall be 10deposited into the Secretary of State Special Services Fund. 11The Secretary may adopt rules regarding the eligibility, 12process, and fee for an expedited Illinois Identification 13Card. If the Secretary of State determines that the volume of 14expedited identification card requests received on a given day 15exceeds the ability of the Secretary to process those requests 16in an expedited manner, the Secretary may decline to provide 17expedited services, and the additional fee for the expedited 18service shall be refunded to the applicant. 19    (a-20) The Secretary of State shall issue a standard 20Illinois Identification Card to a person committed to the 21Department of Corrections, the Department of Juvenile Justice, 22a Federal Bureau of Prisons facility located in Illinois, or a 23county jail or county department of corrections as follows:24        (1) A committed person who has previously held an 25    Illinois Identification Card or an Illinois driver's 26    license shall submit an Identification Card verification   SB3449 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1    form to the Secretary of State, including a photograph 2    taken by the correctional facility, proof of residency 3    upon discharge, and a social security number, if the 4    committed person has a social security number. If the 5    committed person does not have a social security number 6    and is eligible for a social security number, the 7    Secretary of State shall not issue a standard Illinois 8    Identification Card until the committed person obtains a 9    social security number. If the committed person's 10    photograph and demographic information matches an existing 11    Illinois Identification Card or Illinois driver's license 12    and the Secretary of State verifies the applicant's social 13    security number with the Social Security Administration, 14    the Secretary of State shall issue the committed person a 15    standard Illinois Identification Card. If the photograph 16    or demographic information matches an existing Illinois 17    Identification Card or Illinois driver's license in 18    another person's name or identity, a standard Illinois 19    Identification Card shall not be issued until the 20    committed person submits a certified birth certificate and 21    social security card to the Secretary of State and the 22    Secretary of State verifies the identity of the committed 23    person. If the Secretary of State cannot find a match to an 24    existing Illinois Identification Card or Illinois driver's 25    license, the committed person may apply for a standard 26    Illinois Identification card as described in paragraph   SB3449 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1    (2).2        (2) A committed person who has not previously held an 3    Illinois Identification Card or Illinois driver's license 4    or for whom a match cannot be found as described in 5    paragraph (1) shall submit an Illinois Identification Card 6    verification form, including a photograph taken by the 7    correctional facility, a certified birth certificate, 8    proof of residency upon discharge, and a social security 9    number, if the committed person has a social security 10    number. If the committed person does not have a social 11    security number and is eligible for a social security 12    number, the Secretary of State shall not issue a standard 13    Illinois Identification Card until the committed person 14    obtains a social security number. If the Secretary of 15    State verifies the applicant's social security number with 16    the Social Security Administration, the Secretary of State 17    shall issue the committed person a standard Illinois 18    Identification Card.19    The Illinois Identification Card verification form 20described in this subsection shall be prescribed by the 21Secretary of State. The Secretary of State and correctional 22facilities in this State shall establish a secure method to 23transfer the form.24    (a-25) The Secretary of State shall issue a limited-term 25Illinois Identification Card valid for 90 days to a committed 26person upon release on parole, mandatory supervised release,   SB3449 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1aftercare release, final discharge, or pardon from the 2Department of Corrections, the Department of Juvenile Justice, 3a Federal Bureau of Prisons facility located in Illinois, or a 4county jail or county department of corrections, if the 5released person does not obtain a standard Illinois 6Identification Card as described in subsection (a-20) prior to 7release but does present a Secretary of State prescribed 8Identification Card verification form completed by the 9correctional facility, verifying the released person's date of 10birth, social security number, if the person has a social 11security number, and his or her Illinois residence address. 12The verification form must have been completed no more than 30 13days prior to the date of application for the Illinois 14Identification Card.15    Prior to the expiration of the 90-day period of the 16limited-term Illinois Identification Card, if the released 17person submits to the Secretary of State a certified copy of 18his or her birth certificate and his or her social security 19card, if the person has a social security number, or other 20documents authorized by the Secretary, a standard Illinois 21Identification Card shall be issued. A limited-term Illinois 22Identification Card may not be renewed. 23    This subsection shall not apply to a released person who 24was unable to obtain a standard Illinois Identification Card 25because his or her photograph or demographic information 26matched an existing Illinois Identification Card or Illinois   SB3449 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1driver's license in another person's name or identity or to a 2released person who does not have a social security number and 3is eligible for a social security number.4    (a-30) The Secretary of State shall issue a standard 5Illinois Identification Card to a person upon conditional 6release or absolute discharge from the custody of the 7Department of Human Services, if the person presents a 8certified copy of his or her birth certificate, social 9security card, if the person has a social security number, or 10other documents authorized by the Secretary, and a document 11proving his or her Illinois residence address. The Secretary 12of State shall issue a standard Illinois Identification Card 13to a person prior to his or her conditional release or absolute 14discharge if personnel from the Department of Human Services 15bring the person to a Secretary of State location with the 16required documents. Documents proving residence address may 17include any official document of the Department of Human 18Services showing the person's address after release and a 19Secretary of State prescribed verification form, which may be 20executed by personnel of the Department of Human Services.21    (a-35) The Secretary of State shall issue a limited-term 22Illinois Identification Card valid for 90 days to a person 23upon conditional release or absolute discharge from the 24custody of the Department of Human Services, if the person is 25unable to present a certified copy of his or her birth 26certificate and social security card, if the person has a   SB3449 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1social security number, or other documents authorized by the 2Secretary, but does present a Secretary of State prescribed 3verification form completed by the Department of Human 4Services, verifying the person's date of birth and social 5security number, if the person has a social security number, 6and a document proving his or her Illinois residence address. 7The verification form must have been completed no more than 30 8days prior to the date of application for the Illinois 9Identification Card. The Secretary of State shall issue a 10limited-term Illinois Identification Card to a person no 11sooner than 14 days prior to his or her conditional release or 12absolute discharge if personnel from the Department of Human 13Services bring the person to a Secretary of State location 14with the required documents. Documents proving residence 15address shall include any official document of the Department 16of Human Services showing the person's address after release 17and a Secretary of State prescribed verification form, which 18may be executed by personnel of the Department of Human 19Services. 20    (b) The Secretary of State shall issue a special Illinois 21Identification Card, which shall be known as an Illinois 22Person with a Disability Identification Card, to any natural 23person who is a resident of the State of Illinois, who is a 24person with a disability as defined in Section 4A of this Act, 25who applies for such card, or renewal thereof. No Illinois 26Person with a Disability Identification Card shall be issued   SB3449 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1to any person who holds a valid foreign state identification 2card, license, or permit unless the person first surrenders to 3the Secretary of State the valid foreign state identification 4card, license, or permit. The Secretary of State shall charge 5no fee to issue such card. The card shall be prepared and 6supplied by the Secretary of State, and shall include a 7photograph and signature or mark of the applicant, a 8designation indicating that the card is an Illinois Person 9with a Disability Identification Card, and shall include a 10comprehensible designation of the type and classification of 11the applicant's disability as set out in Section 4A of this 12Act. However, the Secretary of State may provide by rule for 13the issuance of Illinois Person with a Disability 14Identification Cards without photographs if the applicant has 15a bona fide religious objection to being photographed or to 16the display of his or her photograph. If the applicant so 17requests, the card shall include a description of the 18applicant's disability and any information about the 19applicant's disability or medical history which the Secretary 20determines would be helpful to the applicant in securing 21emergency medical care. If a mark is used in lieu of a 22signature, such mark shall be affixed to the card in the 23presence of 2 witnesses who attest to the authenticity of the 24mark. The Illinois Person with a Disability Identification 25Card may be used for identification purposes in any lawful 26situation by the person to whom it was issued.  SB3449 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1    The Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card 2may be used as adequate documentation of disability in lieu of 3a physician's determination of disability, a determination of 4disability from a physician assistant, a determination of 5disability from an advanced practice registered nurse, or any 6other documentation of disability whenever any State law 7requires that a person with a disability provide such 8documentation of disability, however an Illinois Person with a 9Disability Identification Card shall not qualify the 10cardholder to participate in any program or to receive any 11benefit which is not available to all persons with like 12disabilities. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, an 13Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card, or 14evidence that the Secretary of State has issued an Illinois 15Person with a Disability Identification Card, shall not be 16used by any person other than the person named on such card to 17prove that the person named on such card is a person with a 18disability or for any other purpose unless the card is used for 19the benefit of the person named on such card, and the person 20named on such card consents to such use at the time the card is 21so used.22    An optometrist's determination of a visual disability 23under Section 4A of this Act is acceptable as documentation 24for the purpose of issuing an Illinois Person with a 25Disability Identification Card. 26    When medical information is contained on an Illinois   SB3449 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1Person with a Disability Identification Card, the Office of 2the Secretary of State shall not be liable for any actions 3taken based upon that medical information.4    (c) The Secretary of State shall provide that each 5original or renewal Illinois Identification Card or Illinois 6Person with a Disability Identification Card issued to a 7person under the age of 21 shall be of a distinct nature from 8those Illinois Identification Cards or Illinois Person with a 9Disability Identification Cards issued to individuals 21 years 10of age or older. The color designated for Illinois 11Identification Cards or Illinois Person with a Disability 12Identification Cards for persons under the age of 21 shall be 13at the discretion of the Secretary of State.14    (c-1) Each original or renewal Illinois Identification 15Card or Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card 16issued to a person under the age of 21 shall display the date 17upon which the person becomes 18 years of age and the date upon 18which the person becomes 21 years of age.19    (c-3) The General Assembly recognizes the need to identify 20military veterans living in this State for the purpose of 21ensuring that they receive all of the services and benefits to 22which they are legally entitled, including healthcare, 23education assistance, and job placement. To assist the State 24in identifying these veterans and delivering these vital 25services and benefits, the Secretary of State is authorized to 26issue Illinois Identification Cards and Illinois Person with a   SB3449 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1Disability Identification Cards with the word "veteran" 2appearing on the face of the cards. This authorization is 3predicated on the unique status of veterans. The Secretary may 4not issue any other identification card which identifies an 5occupation, status, affiliation, hobby, or other unique 6characteristics of the identification card holder which is 7unrelated to the purpose of the identification card.8    (c-5) Beginning on or before July 1, 2015, the Secretary 9of State shall designate a space on each original or renewal 10identification card where, at the request of the applicant, 11the word "veteran" shall be placed. The veteran designation 12shall be available to a person identified as a veteran under 13subsection (b) of Section 5 of this Act who was discharged or 14separated under honorable conditions. 15    (d) The Secretary of State may issue a Senior Citizen 16discount card, to any natural person who is a resident of the 17State of Illinois who is 60 years of age or older and who 18applies for such a card or renewal thereof. The Secretary of 19State shall charge no fee to issue such card. The card shall be 20issued in every county and applications shall be made 21available at, but not limited to, nutrition sites, senior 22citizen centers and Area Agencies on Aging. The applicant, 23upon receipt of such card and prior to its use for any purpose, 24shall have affixed thereon in the space provided therefor his 25signature or mark.26    (e) The Secretary of State, in his or her discretion, may   SB3449 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1designate on each Illinois Identification Card or Illinois 2Person with a Disability Identification Card a space where the 3card holder may place a sticker or decal, issued by the 4Secretary of State, of uniform size as the Secretary may 5specify, that shall indicate in appropriate language that the 6card holder has renewed his or her Illinois Identification 7Card or Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card.8    (f)(1) The Secretary of State may issue a mobile 9identification card to an individual who is otherwise eligible 10to hold a physical credential in addition to, and not instead 11of, an identification card if the Secretary of State has 12issued an identification card to the person. The data elements 13that are used to build an electronic credential must match the 14individual's current Department record.15    (2) The Secretary may enter into agreements or contract 16with an agency of the State, another state, the United States, 17or a third party to facilitate the issuance, use, and 18verification of a mobile identification card issued by the 19Secretary or another state.20    (3) Any mobile identification card issued by the Secretary 21shall be in accordance with the most recent AAMVA standards.22    (4) The Secretary shall design the mobile identification 23card in a manner that allows the credential holder to maintain 24physical possession of the device on which the mobile 25identification card is accessed during verification.26    (g) The verification process shall be implemented to   SB3449 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1require:2        (1) the relying parties to authenticate electronic 3    credentials in accordance with applicable AAMVA standards 4    prior to acceptance of the electronic credential;5        (2) the Secretary to ensure that electronic credential 6    data is subject to all jurisdictional data security and 7    privacy protection laws and regulations; and8        (3) the relying parties to request only electronic 9    credential data elements that are necessary to complete 10    the transaction for which data is being requested.11    (h) Privacy and tracking of data shall be restricted by 12implementing the following requirements:13        (1) the relying parties shall retain only electronic 14    credential data elements for which the relying party 15    explicitly obtained consent from the electronic credential 16    holder and shall inform the electronic credential holder 17    of the use and retention period of the electronic data 18    elements;19        (2) the Secretary shall use an electronic credential 20    system that is designed to maximize the privacy of the 21    credential holder in accordance with State and federal law 22    and shall not track or compile information without the 23    credential holder's consent; and24        (3) the Department shall only compile and disclose 25    information regarding the use of the credential as 26    required by State or federal law.  SB3449 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1    (i)(1) The electronic credential holder shall be required 2to have the holder's physical credential on the holder's 3person for all purposes for which an identification card is 4required. No person, public entity, private entity, or agency 5shall establish a policy that requires an electronic 6credential instead of a physical credential.7    (2) Electronic credential systems shall be designed so 8that there is no requirement for the electronic credential 9holder to display or relinquish possession of the credential 10holder's mobile device to relying parties for the acceptance 11of an electronic credential.12    (3) When required by law and upon request by law 13enforcement, a credential holder must provide the credential 14holder's physical credential.15    (4) Any law or regulation that requires an individual to 16surrender the individual's physical credential to law 17enforcement does not apply to the device on which an 18electronic credential has been provisioned.19    (j) A person may be required to produce when so requested a 20physical identification card to a law enforcement officer, a 21representative of a State or federal department or agency, or 22a private entity and is subject to all applicable laws and 23consequences for failure to produce such an identification 24card.25    (k) The Secretary of State shall adopt such rules as are 26necessary to implement a mobile identification card.  SB3449 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1    (l) The display of a mobile identification card shall not 2serve as consent or authorization for a law enforcement 3officer, or any other person, to search, view, or access any 4other data or application on the mobile device. If a person 5presents the person's mobile device to a law enforcement 6officer for purposes of displaying a mobile identification 7card, the law enforcement officer shall promptly return the 8mobile device to the person once the officer has had an 9opportunity to verify the identity of the person. Except for 10willful and wanton misconduct, any law enforcement officer, 11court, or officer of the court presented with the device shall 12be immune from any liability resulting from damage to the 13mobile device.14    (m) The fee to install the application to display a mobile 15identification card as defined in this subsection shall not 16exceed $6.17    (n) As used in this Section:18    "AAMVA" means the American Association of Motor Vehicle 19Administrators.20    "Credential" means a driver's license, learner's permit, 21or identification card.22    "Credential holder" means the individual to whom a mobile 23driver's license or a mobile identification card is issued.24    "Data element" means a distinct component of a customer's 25information that is found on the Department's customer record.26    "Department" means the Secretary of State Department of   SB3449 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1Driver Services.2    "Electronic credential" means an electronic extension of 3the departmental issued physical credential that conveys 4identity and complies with AAMVA's mobile driver license 5Implementation guidelines and the ISO/IEC 18013-5 standard.6    "Electronic credential system" means a digital process 7that includes a method for provisioning electronic 8credentials, requesting and transmitting electronic credential 9data elements, and performing tasks to maintain the system.10    "Full profile" means all the information provided on an 11identification card.12    "ISO" means the International Organization for 13Standardization, which creates uniform processes and 14procedures. 15    "Limited profile" means a portion of the information 16provided on an Identification Card.17    "Mobile identification card" means a data file that is 18available on any mobile device that has connectivity to the 19Internet through an application that allows the mobile device 20to download the data file from the Secretary of State, that 21contains all the data elements visible on the face and back of 22an identification card, and that displays the current status 23of the identification card. "Mobile identification card" does 24not include a copy, photograph, or image of an Illinois 25Identification Card that is not downloaded through the 26application on a mobile device.  SB3449 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1    "Physical credential" means a Department-issued document 2that conveys identity in accordance with the Illinois 3Identification Card Act.4    "Provision" means the initial loading of an electronic 5credential onto a device.6    "Relying party" means the entity to which the credential 7holder presents the electronic credential.8    "Verification process" means a method of authenticating 9the electronic credential through the use of secured 10encryption communication. 11    (o) Upon providing the required documentation, at the 12request of the applicant, the identification card may reflect 13Gold Star Family designation. The Secretary shall designate a 14space on each original or renewal of an identification card 15for such designation. This designation shall be available to a 16person eligible for Gold Star license plates under subsection 17(f) of Section 6-106 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 18(Source: P.A. 103-210, eff. 7-1-24; 103-345, eff. 1-1-24; 19103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-782, eff. 8-6-24; 103-824, eff. 201-1-25; 103-933, eff. 1-1-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-443, 21eff. 1-1-26; revised 1-7-26.) 22    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-457)23    Sec. 4. Identification card. 24    (a) In accordance with the requirements of this Section, 25the Secretary of State shall issue a standard Illinois   SB3449 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1Identification Card, as well as a mobile Illinois 2Identification Card, to any natural person who is a resident 3of the State of Illinois who applies for such a card, or 4renewal thereof. No identification card shall be issued to any 5person who holds a valid foreign state identification card, 6license, or permit unless the person first surrenders to the 7Secretary of State the valid foreign state identification 8card, license, or permit. The card shall be prepared and 9supplied by the Secretary of State and shall include a 10photograph and signature or mark of the applicant. However, 11the Secretary of State may provide by rule for the issuance of 12Illinois Identification Cards without photographs if the 13applicant has a bona fide religious objection to being 14photographed or to the display of his or her photograph. The 15Illinois Identification Card may be used for identification 16purposes in any lawful situation only by the person to whom it 17was issued. As used in this Act, "photograph" means any color 18photograph or digitally produced and captured image of an 19applicant for an identification card. As used in this Act, 20"signature" means the name of a person as written by that 21person and captured in a manner acceptable to the Secretary of 22State.23    (a-5) If an applicant for an identification card has a 24current driver's license or instruction permit issued by the 25Secretary of State, the Secretary may require the applicant to 26utilize the same residence address and name on the   SB3449 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1identification card, driver's license, and instruction permit 2records maintained by the Secretary. The Secretary may 3promulgate rules to implement this provision. 4    (a-10) If the applicant is a judicial officer as defined 5in Section 1-10 of the Judicial Privacy Act, a public official 6as defined in Section 10 of the Public Official Safety and 7Privacy Act, or a peace officer, the applicant may elect to 8have his or her office or work address listed on the card 9instead of the applicant's residence or mailing address. The 10Secretary may promulgate rules to implement this provision. 11For the purposes of this subsection (a-10), "peace officer" 12means any person who by virtue of his or her office or public 13employment is vested by law with a duty to maintain public 14order or to make arrests for a violation of any penal statute 15of this State, whether that duty extends to all violations or 16is limited to specific violations. 17    (a-15) The Secretary of State may provide for an expedited 18process for the issuance of an Illinois Identification Card. 19The Secretary shall charge an additional fee for the expedited 20issuance of an Illinois Identification Card, to be set by 21rule, not to exceed $75. All fees collected by the Secretary 22for expedited Illinois Identification Card service shall be 23deposited into the Secretary of State Special Services Fund. 24The Secretary may adopt rules regarding the eligibility, 25process, and fee for an expedited Illinois Identification 26Card. If the Secretary of State determines that the volume of   SB3449 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1expedited identification card requests received on a given day 2exceeds the ability of the Secretary to process those requests 3in an expedited manner, the Secretary may decline to provide 4expedited services, and the additional fee for the expedited 5service shall be refunded to the applicant. 6    (a-20) The Secretary of State shall issue a standard 7Illinois Identification Card to a person committed to the 8Department of Corrections, the Department of Juvenile Justice, 9a Federal Bureau of Prisons facility located in Illinois, or a 10county jail or county department of corrections as follows:11        (1) A committed person who has previously held an 12    Illinois Identification Card or an Illinois driver's 13    license shall submit an Identification Card verification 14    form to the Secretary of State, including a photograph 15    taken by the correctional facility, proof of residency 16    upon discharge, and a social security number, if the 17    committed person has a social security number. If the 18    committed person does not have a social security number 19    and is eligible for a social security number, the 20    Secretary of State shall not issue a standard Illinois 21    Identification Card until the committed person obtains a 22    social security number. If the committed person's 23    photograph and demographic information matches an existing 24    Illinois Identification Card or Illinois driver's license 25    and the Secretary of State verifies the applicant's social 26    security number with the Social Security Administration,   SB3449 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1    the Secretary of State shall issue the committed person a 2    standard Illinois Identification Card. If the photograph 3    or demographic information matches an existing Illinois 4    Identification Card or Illinois driver's license in 5    another person's name or identity, a standard Illinois 6    Identification Card shall not be issued until the 7    committed person submits a certified birth certificate and 8    social security card to the Secretary of State and the 9    Secretary of State verifies the identity of the committed 10    person. If the Secretary of State cannot find a match to an 11    existing Illinois Identification Card or Illinois driver's 12    license, the committed person may apply for a standard 13    Illinois Identification card as described in paragraph 14    (2).15        (2) A committed person who has not previously held an 16    Illinois Identification Card or Illinois driver's license 17    or for whom a match cannot be found as described in 18    paragraph (1) shall submit an Illinois Identification Card 19    verification form, including a photograph taken by the 20    correctional facility, a certified birth certificate, 21    proof of residency upon discharge, and a social security 22    number, if the committed has a social security number. If 23    the committed person does not have a social security 24    number and is eligible for a social security number, the 25    Secretary of State shall not issue a standard Illinois 26    Identification Card until the committed person obtains a   SB3449 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1    social security number. If the Secretary of State verifies 2    the applicant's social security number with the Social 3    Security Administration, the Secretary of State shall 4    issue the committed person a standard Illinois 5    Identification Card.6    The Illinois Identification Card verification form 7described in this subsection shall be prescribed by the 8Secretary of State. The Secretary of State and correctional 9facilities in this State shall establish a secure method to 10transfer the form.11    (a-25) The Secretary of State shall issue a limited-term 12Illinois Identification Card valid for 90 days to a committed 13person upon release on parole, mandatory supervised release, 14aftercare release, final discharge, or pardon from the 15Department of Corrections, the Department of Juvenile Justice, 16a Federal Bureau of Prisons facility located in Illinois, or a 17county jail or county department of corrections, if the 18released person does not obtain a standard Illinois 19Identification Card as described in subsection (a-20) prior to 20release but does present a Secretary of State prescribed 21Identification Card verification form completed by the 22correctional facility, verifying the released person's date of 23birth, social security number, if the person has a social 24security number, and his or her Illinois residence address. 25The verification form must have been completed no more than 30 26days prior to the date of application for the Illinois   SB3449 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1Identification Card.2    Prior to the expiration of the 90-day period of the 3limited-term Illinois Identification Card, if the released 4person submits to the Secretary of State a certified copy of 5his or her birth certificate and his or her social security 6card, if the person has a social security number, or other 7documents authorized by the Secretary, a standard Illinois 8Identification Card shall be issued. A limited-term Illinois 9Identification Card may not be renewed. 10    This subsection shall not apply to a released person who 11was unable to obtain a standard Illinois Identification Card 12because his or her photograph or demographic information 13matched an existing Illinois Identification Card or Illinois 14driver's license in another person's name or identity or to a 15released person who does not have a social security number and 16is eligible for a social security number.17    (a-30) The Secretary of State shall issue a standard 18Illinois Identification Card to a person upon conditional 19release or absolute discharge from the custody of the 20Department of Human Services, if the person presents a 21certified copy of his or her birth certificate, social 22security card, if the person has a social security number, or 23other documents authorized by the Secretary, and a document 24proving his or her Illinois residence address. The Secretary 25of State shall issue a standard Illinois Identification Card 26to a person prior to his or her conditional release or absolute   SB3449 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1discharge if personnel from the Department of Human Services 2bring the person to a Secretary of State location with the 3required documents. Documents proving residence address may 4include any official document of the Department of Human 5Services showing the person's address after release and a 6Secretary of State prescribed verification form, which may be 7executed by personnel of the Department of Human Services.8    (a-35) The Secretary of State shall issue a limited-term 9Illinois Identification Card valid for 90 days to a person 10upon conditional release or absolute discharge from the 11custody of the Department of Human Services, if the person is 12unable to present a certified copy of his or her birth 13certificate and social security card, if the person has a 14social security number, or other documents authorized by the 15Secretary, but does present a Secretary of State prescribed 16verification form completed by the Department of Human 17Services, verifying the person's date of birth and social 18security number, if the person has a social security number, 19and a document proving his or her Illinois residence address. 20The verification form must have been completed no more than 30 21days prior to the date of application for the Illinois 22Identification Card. The Secretary of State shall issue a 23limited-term Illinois Identification Card to a person no 24sooner than 14 days prior to his or her conditional release or 25absolute discharge if personnel from the Department of Human 26Services bring the person to a Secretary of State location   SB3449 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1with the required documents. Documents proving residence 2address shall include any official document of the Department 3of Human Services showing the person's address after release 4and a Secretary of State prescribed verification form, which 5may be executed by personnel of the Department of Human 6Services. 7    (b) The Secretary of State shall issue a special Illinois 8Identification Card, which shall be known as an Illinois 9Person with a Disability Identification Card, to any natural 10person who is a resident of the State of Illinois, who is a 11person with a disability as defined in Section 4A of this Act, 12who applies for such card, or renewal thereof. No Illinois 13Person with a Disability Identification Card shall be issued 14to any person who holds a valid foreign state identification 15card, license, or permit unless the person first surrenders to 16the Secretary of State the valid foreign state identification 17card, license, or permit. The Secretary of State shall charge 18no fee to issue such card. The card shall be prepared and 19supplied by the Secretary of State, and shall include a 20photograph and signature or mark of the applicant, a 21designation indicating that the card is an Illinois Person 22with a Disability Identification Card, and shall include a 23comprehensible designation of the type and classification of 24the applicant's disability as set out in Section 4A of this 25Act. However, the Secretary of State may provide by rule for 26the issuance of Illinois Person with a Disability   SB3449 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1Identification Cards without photographs if the applicant has 2a bona fide religious objection to being photographed or to 3the display of his or her photograph. If the applicant so 4requests, the card shall include a description of the 5applicant's disability and any information about the 6applicant's disability or medical history which the Secretary 7determines would be helpful to the applicant in securing 8emergency medical care. If a mark is used in lieu of a 9signature, such mark shall be affixed to the card in the 10presence of 2 witnesses who attest to the authenticity of the 11mark. The Illinois Person with a Disability Identification 12Card may be used for identification purposes in any lawful 13situation by the person to whom it was issued.14    The Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card 15may be used as adequate documentation of disability in lieu of 16a physician's determination of disability, a determination of 17disability from a physician assistant, a determination of 18disability from an advanced practice registered nurse, or any 19other documentation of disability whenever any State law 20requires that a person with a disability provide such 21documentation of disability, however an Illinois Person with a 22Disability Identification Card shall not qualify the 23cardholder to participate in any program or to receive any 24benefit which is not available to all persons with like 25disabilities. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, an 26Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card, or   SB3449 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1evidence that the Secretary of State has issued an Illinois 2Person with a Disability Identification Card, shall not be 3used by any person other than the person named on such card to 4prove that the person named on such card is a person with a 5disability or for any other purpose unless the card is used for 6the benefit of the person named on such card, and the person 7named on such card consents to such use at the time the card is 8so used.9    An optometrist's determination of a visual disability 10under Section 4A of this Act is acceptable as documentation 11for the purpose of issuing an Illinois Person with a 12Disability Identification Card. 13    When medical information is contained on an Illinois 14Person with a Disability Identification Card, the Office of 15the Secretary of State shall not be liable for any actions 16taken based upon that medical information.17    The Secretary of State shall add a marker or box to the 18Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card that can 19be used to record and demonstrate that the holder of the card 20has presented documentation of certification of eligibility to 21receive complementary paratransit services under 49 CFR Part 2237, Subpart F by an entity that is required to provide those 23services in the State. 24    (c) The Secretary of State shall provide that each 25original or renewal Illinois Identification Card or Illinois 26Person with a Disability Identification Card issued to a   SB3449 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1person under the age of 21 shall be of a distinct nature from 2those Illinois Identification Cards or Illinois Person with a 3Disability Identification Cards issued to individuals 21 years 4of age or older. The color designated for Illinois 5Identification Cards or Illinois Person with a Disability 6Identification Cards for persons under the age of 21 shall be 7at the discretion of the Secretary of State.8    (c-1) Each original or renewal Illinois Identification 9Card or Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card 10issued to a person under the age of 21 shall display the date 11upon which the person becomes 18 years of age and the date upon 12which the person becomes 21 years of age.13    (c-3) The General Assembly recognizes the need to identify 14military veterans living in this State for the purpose of 15ensuring that they receive all of the services and benefits to 16which they are legally entitled, including healthcare, 17education assistance, and job placement. To assist the State 18in identifying these veterans and delivering these vital 19services and benefits, the Secretary of State is authorized to 20issue Illinois Identification Cards and Illinois Person with a 21Disability Identification Cards with the word "veteran" 22appearing on the face of the cards. This authorization is 23predicated on the unique status of veterans. The Secretary may 24not issue any other identification card which identifies an 25occupation, status, affiliation, hobby, or other unique 26characteristics of the identification card holder which is   SB3449 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1unrelated to the purpose of the identification card.2    (c-5) Beginning on or before July 1, 2015, the Secretary 3of State shall designate a space on each original or renewal 4identification card where, at the request of the applicant, 5the word "veteran" shall be placed. The veteran designation 6shall be available to a person identified as a veteran under 7subsection (b) of Section 5 of this Act who was discharged or 8separated under honorable conditions. 9    (d) The Secretary of State may issue a Senior Citizen 10discount card, to any natural person who is a resident of the 11State of Illinois who is 60 years of age or older and who 12applies for such a card or renewal thereof. The Secretary of 13State shall charge no fee to issue such card. The card shall be 14issued in every county and applications shall be made 15available at, but not limited to, nutrition sites, senior 16citizen centers and Area Agencies on Aging. The applicant, 17upon receipt of such card and prior to its use for any purpose, 18shall have affixed thereon in the space provided therefor his 19signature or mark.20    (e) The Secretary of State, in his or her discretion, may 21designate on each Illinois Identification Card or Illinois 22Person with a Disability Identification Card a space where the 23card holder may place a sticker or decal, issued by the 24Secretary of State, of uniform size as the Secretary may 25specify, that shall indicate in appropriate language that the 26card holder has renewed his or her Illinois Identification   SB3449 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1Card or Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card.2    (f)(1) The Secretary of State may issue a mobile 3identification card to an individual who holds a valid and 4unexpired is otherwise eligible to hold a physical 5identification card issued by the Secretary of State 6credential in addition to, and not instead of, an 7identification card if the Secretary of State has issued an 8identification card to the person. The data elements of a 9mobile identification card that are used to build an 10electronic credential must match the individual's current 11identification card Department record.12    (2) The Secretary may enter into agreements or contract 13with an agency of the State, another state, the United States, 14or a third party to facilitate the issuance, use, and 15verification of a mobile identification card issued by the 16Secretary or another state.17    (3) Any mobile identification card issued by the Secretary 18shall be in accordance with the AAMVA's Mobile Driver's 19License (mDL) Implementation Guidelines Version 1.5 (May 202025), as may be amended or updated from time to time most 21recent AAMVA standards.22    (4) The Secretary shall design the mobile identification 23card in a manner that allows the mobile identification card 24credential holder to maintain physical possession of the 25device on which the mobile identification card is provisioned 26accessed during verification by a relying party.  SB3449 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1    (g) The verification process shall be implemented to 2require:3        (1) a the relying party parties to authenticate a 4    mobile identification card electronic credentials in 5    accordance with applicable AAMVA standards prior to 6    acceptance of the mobile identification card electronic 7    credential;8        (2) the Secretary to ensure that mobile identification 9    card electronic credential data is subject to all 10    jurisdictional data security and privacy protection laws 11    and regulations; and12        (3) a the relying party parties to request only mobile 13    identification card electronic credential data elements 14    that are necessary to complete the transaction for which 15    data is being requested.16    (h) Privacy and tracking of data shall be restricted by 17implementing the following requirements:18        (1) a the relying party parties shall retain only 19    mobile identification card electronic credential data 20    elements for which the relying party explicitly obtained 21    consent from the mobile identification card electronic 22    credential holder and shall inform the mobile 23    identification card electronic credential holder of the 24    use and retention period of the electronic data elements;25        (2) the Secretary shall use a mobile identification 26    card an electronic credential system that is designed to   SB3449 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1    maximize the privacy of the mobile identification card 2    credential holder in accordance with State and federal law 3    and shall not track or compile information without the 4    mobile identification card credential holder's consent; 5    and6        (3) the Department shall only compile and disclose 7    information regarding the use of a mobile identification 8    card the credential as required by State or federal law.9    (i)(1) A mobile identification card The electronic 10credential holder shall be required to have the holder's 11physical identification card credential on the holder's person 12for all purposes for which an identification card is required. 13No person, public entity, private entity, or agency shall 14establish a policy that requires a mobile identification card 15an electronic credential instead of a physical identification 16card credential.17    (2) A mobile identification card Electronic credential 18systems shall be designed so that there is no requirement for 19the mobile identification card electronic credential holder to 20display or relinquish possession of the mobile identification 21card credential holder's mobile device to a relying party 22parties for the acceptance of a mobile identification card. No 23relying party, including law enforcement, may take physical 24possession of a mobile identification card holder's mobile 25device for purposes of verifying the mobile identification 26card holder's identity an electronic credential.   SB3449 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1    (3) When required by law and upon request by law 2enforcement, a representative of a State or federal department 3or agency, or a private entity, a mobile identification card 4credential holder must provide the holder's physical 5identification card and is subject to all applicable laws and 6consequences for failure to produce such an identification 7card the credential holder's physical credential.8    (4) Any law or regulation that requires an individual to 9surrender the individual's physical identification card 10credential to law enforcement does not apply to the device on 11which a mobile identification card an electronic credential 12has been provisioned.13    (j) (Blank). A person may be required to produce when so 14requested a physical identification card to a law enforcement 15officer, a representative of a State or federal department or 16agency, or a private entity and is subject to all applicable 17laws and consequences for failure to produce such an 18identification card.19    (k) The Secretary of State shall adopt such rules as are 20necessary to implement a mobile identification card.21    (l) The use display of a mobile identification card shall 22not serve as consent or authorization for a law enforcement 23officer, or any other person, to search, view, or access any 24other data or application on the mobile device. If a person 25presents the person's mobile device to a law enforcement 26officer for purposes of displaying a mobile identification   SB3449 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1card, the law enforcement officer shall promptly return the 2mobile device to the person once the officer has had an 3opportunity to verify the identity of the person. Except for 4willful and wanton misconduct, any law enforcement officer, 5court, or officer of the court presented with the device shall 6be immune from any liability resulting from damage to the 7mobile device.8    (m) (Blank). The fee to install the application to display 9a mobile identification card as defined in this subsection 10shall not exceed $6.11    (n) As used in this Section:12    "AAMVA" means the American Association of Motor Vehicle 13Administrators.14    "Credential" means a driver's license, learner's permit, 15or identification card.16    "Credential holder" means the individual to whom a mobile 17driver's license or a mobile identification card is issued.18    "Data element" means a distinct component of a customer's 19information that is found on the Department's customer record.20    "Department" means the Secretary of State Department of 21Driver Services.22    "Electronic credential" means an electronic extension of 23the departmental issued physical credential that conveys 24identity and complies with AAMVA's mobile driver license 25Implementation guidelines and the ISO/IEC 18013-5 standard.26    "Electronic credential system" means a digital process   SB3449 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1that includes a method for provisioning electronic 2credentials, requesting and transmitting electronic credential 3data elements, and performing tasks to maintain the system.4    "Full profile" means all the information provided on an 5identification card.6    "ISO" means the International Organization for 7Standardization, which creates uniform processes and 8procedures. 9    "Limited profile" means a portion of the information 10provided on an Identification Card.11    "Mobile credential system" means a digital process that 12includes a method for provisioning a mobile identification 13card, requesting and transmitting mobile identification data 14elements, and performing tasks to maintain the system. 15    "Mobile identification card" means an identification card 16that resides on a mobile device or requires a mobile device as 17part of the process to gain access to the related information a 18data file that is available on any mobile device that has 19connectivity to the Internet through an application that 20allows the mobile device to download the data file from the 21Secretary of State, that contains all the data elements 22visible on the face and back of an identification card, and 23that displays the current status of the identification card. 24"Mobile identification card" does not include a copy, 25photograph, or image of an Illinois Identification Card that 26is not provisioned downloaded through a participating wallet   SB3449 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1provider the application on a mobile device.2    "Physical credential" means a Department-issued document 3that conveys identity in accordance with the Illinois 4Identification Card Act.5    "Provision" means the initial loading of a mobile 6identification card an electronic credential onto a device.7    "Relying party" means the entity to which the 8identification card credential holder presents the holder's 9mobile identification card the electronic credential.10    "Verification process" means a method of authenticating 11the mobile identification card electronic credential through 12the use of secured encryption communication. 13    (o) Upon providing the required documentation, at the 14request of the applicant, the identification card may reflect 15Gold Star Family designation. The Secretary shall designate a 16space on each original or renewal of an identification card 17for such designation. This designation shall be available to a 18person eligible for Gold Star license plates under subsection 19(f) of Section 6-106 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 20(Source: P.A. 103-210, eff. 7-1-24; 103-345, eff. 1-1-24; 21103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-782, eff. 8-6-24; 103-824, eff. 221-1-25; 103-933, eff. 1-1-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-443, 23eff. 1-1-26; 104-457, eff. 6-1-26; revised 1-7-26.) 24    (15 ILCS 335/14D)25    Sec. 14D. Limitations on use of identification card   SB3449 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1information.2    (a) When information is obtained from an identification 3card issued by the Secretary of State to identify or prove the 4age of the holder of the card, or in the course of a commercial 5transaction, that information may be used only for purposes of 6identification of the individual or for completing the 7commercial transaction in which the information was obtained, 8including all subsequent payment, processing, collection, and 9other related actions and may not be maintained or stored for 10longer than what is strictly necessary for the purpose for 11which the information was provided. Information obtained from 12an identification card issued by the Secretary of State may 13not be used for purposes unrelated to the transaction in which 14it was obtained, including, but not limited to, commercial 15solicitations. Information obtained from an identification 16card issued by the Secretary of State to identify or prove the 17age of the holder of the card, or in the course of a commercial 18transaction, may not be sold, leased or otherwise provided to 19any third party.20    (b) As used in this Section: ,21    "Identification card" includes a mobile identification 22card as that term is defined in subsection (n) of Section 4.23    "Information" "information" on an identification card 24issued by the Secretary of State includes readable text on the 25face of the card and information encoded or encrypted into a 26bar code, magnetic strip, or other electronically readable   SB3449 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1device on or in the card.2    (c) Any individual whose identification card information 3has been used in violation of this Section has a cause of 4action against the person who violated this Section. Upon a 5finding that a violation did occur, the individual whose 6information was used in violation of this Section is entitled 7to recover actual damages, but not less than liquidated 8damages in the amount of $250 for each violation, plus 9attorney's fees and the costs of bringing the action.10    (d) Use of information contained on an identification card 11issued by the Secretary of State is not a violation of this 12Section if the individual whose information has been used gave 13express permission for that use, or if the information 14relating to the individual was obtained from a source other 15than the individual's identification card issued by the 16Secretary of State.17    (e) This Section does not apply to any agency of the United 18States or to the State of Illinois or any of its political 19subdivisions.20    (f) This Section does not apply to the transfer of 21information to a third party if (i) a federal or State law, 22rule, or regulation requires that the information be 23transferred to a third party after being recorded in specified 24transactions or (ii) the information is transferred to a third 25party for purposes of the detection or possible prosecution of 26criminal offenses or fraud. If information is transferred to a   SB3449 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1third party under this subsection (f), it may be used only for 2the purposes authorized by this subsection (f).3    (g) This Section does not apply to the use of information 4obtained from an identification card which has been provided 5by the holder of the card in the course of a potential or 6completed employment, commercial, business or professional 7transaction for the purpose of completing written documents 8including, but not limited to, contracts, agreements, purchase 9orders, retail installment contracts, buyer's orders, purchase 10contracts, repair orders, applications, disclosure forms or 11waiver forms. 12(Source: P.A. 94-892, eff. 1-1-07.) 13    Section 10. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 14changing Sections 6-101 and 6-117.1 as follows: 15    (625 ILCS 5/6-101)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 6-101)16    Sec. 6-101. Drivers must have licenses or permits. 17    (a) No person, except those expressly exempted by Section 186-102, shall drive any motor vehicle upon a highway in this 19State unless such person has a valid license or permit, an 20Illinois mobile driver's license, or a restricted driving 21permit, issued under the provisions of this Act.22    (b) No person shall drive a motor vehicle unless the 23person holds a valid license or permit, an Illinois mobile 24driver's license, or a restricted driving permit issued under   SB3449 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1this Act. Any person to whom a license is issued under the 2provisions of this Act must surrender to the Secretary of 3State all valid licenses or permits, except that an applicant 4for a non-domiciled commercial learner's permit or commercial 5driver's license shall not be required to surrender a license 6or permit issued by the applicant's state or country of 7domicile. No driver's license or instruction permit shall be 8issued to any person who holds a valid Foreign State license, 9identification card, or permit unless such person first 10surrenders to the Secretary of State any such valid Foreign 11State license, identification card, or permit.12    (b-5) Any person who commits a violation of subsection (a) 13or (b) of this Section is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor, if 14at the time of the violation the person's driver's license or 15permit was cancelled under clause (a)9 of Section 6-201 of 16this Code. 17    (c) Any person licensed as a driver hereunder shall not be 18required by any city, village, incorporated town or other 19municipal corporation to obtain any other license to exercise 20the privilege thereby granted.21    (d) In addition to other penalties imposed under this 22Section, any person in violation of this Section who is also in 23violation of Section 7-601 of this Code relating to mandatory 24insurance requirements shall have his or her motor vehicle 25immediately impounded by the arresting law enforcement 26officer. The motor vehicle may be released to any licensed   SB3449 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1driver upon a showing of proof of insurance for the motor 2vehicle that was impounded and the notarized written consent 3for the release by the vehicle owner.4    (e) In addition to other penalties imposed under this 5Section, the vehicle of any person in violation of this 6Section who is also in violation of Section 7-601 of this Code 7relating to mandatory insurance requirements and who, in 8violating this Section, has caused death or personal injury to 9another person is subject to forfeiture under Sections 36-1 10and 36-2 of the Criminal Code of 2012. For the purposes of this 11Section, a personal injury shall include any type A injury as 12indicated on the traffic crash report completed by a law 13enforcement officer that requires immediate professional 14attention in either a doctor's office or a medical facility. A 15type A injury shall include severely bleeding wounds, 16distorted extremities, and injuries that require the injured 17party to be carried from the scene.18    (f)(1) The Secretary of State may issue a mobile driver's 19license to an individual who holds a valid and unexpired 20physical driver's license. The data elements of a mobile 21driver's license card must match the individual's current 22driver's license Department record in addition to, and not 23instead of, a license or an identification card if the 24Secretary of State has issued a driver's license to the 25person. 26    (2) The Secretary may enter into agreements with an agency   SB3449 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1of the State, another state, or the United States to 2facilitate the issuance, use, and verification of a mobile 3driver's license issued by the Secretary or another state.4    (3) Any mobile driver's license issued by the Secretary 5shall be in accordance with American Association of Motor 6Vehicle Administrator's Mobile Driver's License (mDL) 7Implementation Guidelines, Version 1.5 (May 2025), as may be 8amended or updated from time to time 1.1.9    (4) The Secretary shall design the mobile driver's license 10in a manner that allows the mobile driver's license credential 11holder to maintain physical possession of the device on which 12the mobile driver's license electronic credential is 13provisioned accessed during verification by a relying party.14    (g) (Blank). As used in this Section:15    "Mobile driver's license" means an electronic extension of 16the Secretary of State issued physical driver's license that 17conveys identity and driving privilege information and is in 18compliance with the American Association of Motor Vehicle 19Administrator's Mobile Driver's License Implementation 20Guidelines and the ISO/IEC 18013-5 standard. "Mobile driver's 21license" does not include a digital copy, photograph, or image 22of a driver's license that is not downloaded through the 23Secretary of State's application on a mobile device.24    (h) (Blank). A person may be required to produce when so 25requested a physical driver's license to a law enforcement 26officer, a representative of a State or federal department or   SB3449 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1agency, or a private entity and is subject to all applicable 2laws and consequences for failure to produce such a license.3    (i) The Secretary of State shall adopt such rules as are 4necessary to implement a mobile driver's license.5    (i-5) The verification process shall be implemented to 6require:7        (1) a relying party to authenticate a mobile driver's 8    license in accordance with applicable AAMVA standards 9    prior to acceptance of the mobile driver's license;10        (2) the Secretary to ensure that mobile driver's 11    license data is subject to all jurisdictional data 12    security and privacy protection laws and regulations; and13        (3) a relying party to request only mobile driver's 14    license data elements that are necessary to complete the 15    transaction for which data is being requested.16    (i-10) Privacy and tracking of data shall be restricted by 17implementing the following requirements:18        (1) a relying party shall retain only mobile driver's 19    license data elements for which the relying party 20    explicitly obtained consent from the mobile driver's 21    license holder and shall inform the mobile driver's 22    license holder of the use and retention period of the 23    electronic data elements;24        (2) the Secretary shall use a mobile driver's license 25    system that is designed to maximize the privacy of the 26    mobile driver's license holder in accordance with State   SB3449 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1    and federal law and shall not track or compile information 2    without the mobile driver's license holder's consent; and3        (3) the Department shall only compile and disclose 4    information regarding the use of a mobile driver's license 5    as required by State or federal law.6    (i-15)(1) A mobile driver's license holder shall be 7required to have the holder's physical driver's license on the 8holder's person for all purposes for which a driver's license 9is required. No person, public entity, private entity, or 10agency shall establish a policy that requires a mobile 11driver's license instead of a physical driver's license.12    (2) A mobile driver's license system shall be designed so 13that there is no requirement for the mobile driver's license 14holder to display or relinquish possession of the mobile 15driver's license holder's mobile device to a relying party for 16the acceptance of a mobile driver's license. No relying party, 17including law enforcement, may take physical possession of a 18mobile driver's license holder's mobile device for purposes of 19verifying the mobile driver's license holder's identity.20    (3) When required by law and upon request by law 21enforcement, a representative of a State or federal department 22or agency, or a private entity a mobile driver's license 23holder must provide the holder's physical driver's license and 24is subject to all applicable laws and consequences for failure 25to produce such a driver's license.26    (4) Any law or regulation that requires an individual to   SB3449 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1surrender the individual's physical driver's license to law 2enforcement does not apply to the device on which a mobile 3driver's license been provisioned. 4     (j) The use display of a mobile driver's license shall not 5serve as consent or authorization for a law enforcement 6officer, or any other person, to search, view, or access any 7other data or application on the mobile device. If a person 8presents his or her mobile device to a law enforcement officer 9for purposes of displaying a mobile driver's license, the law 10enforcement officer shall promptly return the mobile device to 11the person once the officer has had an opportunity to verify 12the identity and license status of the person. Except for 13willful and wanton misconduct, any law enforcement officer, 14court, or officer of the court presented with the device shall 15be immune from any liability resulting from damage to the 16mobile device.17     (k) (Blank). The fee to install the application to 18display a mobile driver's license as defined in this 19subsection shall not exceed $6. 20    (l) As used in this Section:21    "AAMVA" means the American Association of Motor Vehicle 22Administrators.23    "Data element" means a distinct component of a customer's 24information that is found on the Department's customer record.25    "Department" means the Secretary of State Department of 26Driver Services.   SB3449 Enrolled- 47 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1    Mobile driver's license" means a driver's license that 2resides on a mobile device or requires a mobile device as part 3of the process to gain access to the related information. 4Mobile driver's license" does not include a digital copy, 5photograph, or image of a driver's license that is not 6provisioned through a participating digital wallet provider. 7    "Mobile driver's license system" means a digital process 8that includes a method for provisioning a mobile driver's 9license, requesting and transmitting driver's license data 10elements, and performing tasks to maintain the system.11    "Provision" means the initial loading of a driver's 12license onto a device.13    "Relying party" means the entity to which the driver's 14license holder presents the holder's driver's license.15    "Verification process" means a method of authenticating 16the mobile driver's license through the use of secured 17encryption communication. 18    (o) The Secretary of State shall adopt rules as are 19necessary to implement a mobile driver's license. 20(Source: P.A. 102-982, eff. 7-1-23; 103-824, eff. 1-1-25.) 21    (625 ILCS 5/6-117.1)22    Sec. 6-117.1. Prohibited use of driver's license 23information.24    (a) When information is obtained from a driver's license 25to identify or prove the age of the holder of the license, or   SB3449 Enrolled- 48 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1in the course of a commercial transaction, that information 2may be used only for purposes of identification of the 3individual or for completing the commercial transaction in 4which the information was obtained, including all subsequent 5payment, processing, collection, and other related actions and 6may not be maintained or stored for longer than what is 7strictly necessary for the purpose for which the information 8was provided. Information obtained from a driver's license may 9not be used for purposes unrelated to the transaction in which 10it was obtained, including, but not limited to, commercial 11solicitations. Information obtained from a driver's license to 12identify the holder of the license, or in the course of a 13commercial transaction, may not be sold, leased, or otherwise 14provided to any third party.15    (b) Any individual whose driver's license information has 16been used in violation of this Section has a cause of action 17against the person who violated this Section. Upon a finding 18that a violation did occur, the individual whose information 19was used in violation of this Section is entitled to recover 20actual damages, but not less than liquidated damages in the 21amount of $250 for each violation, plus attorney's fees and 22the costs of bringing the action.23    (c) Use of information contained on a driver's license is 24not a violation of this Section if (i) the individual whose 25information has been used gave express permission for that use 26or (ii) the information relating to the individual was   SB3449 Enrolled- 49 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1obtained from a source other than the individual's driver's 2license.3    (d) This Section does not apply to any agency of the United 4States, the State of Illinois, or any other state or political 5subdivision thereof.6    (e) This Section does not apply to the transfer of 7information to a third party if (i) a federal or State law, 8rule, or regulation requires that the information be 9transferred to a third party after being recorded in specified 10transactions or (ii) the information is transferred to a third 11party for purposes of the detection or possible prosecution of 12criminal offenses or fraud. If information is transferred to a 13third party under this subsection (e), it may be used only for 14the purposes authorized by this subsection (e). 15    (f) This Section does not apply to the use of information 16obtained from a driver's license which has been provided by 17the holder of the license in the course of a potential or 18completed employment, commercial, business or professional 19transaction for the purpose of completing written documents 20including, but not limited to, contracts, agreements, purchase 21orders, retail installment contracts, buyer's orders, purchase 22contracts, repair orders, applications, disclosure forms or 23waiver forms. 24    (g) As used in this Section, "driver's license" includes a 25mobile driver's license as that term is defined in subsection 26(l) of Section 6-101.   SB3449 Enrolled- 50 -LRB104 20542 SPS 34019 b1(Source: P.A. 94-892, eff. 1-1-07.) 2    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 3changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 4that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 5represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 6not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 7made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 8Public Act. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.